Nevada, session 83, AB423.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 2. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 3.3. NRS 612.553 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.553 1. For the purposes of this section:
(a) “Indian tribe” includes any entity described in subsection 10
of NRS 612.055.
(b) “Nonprofit organization” means any entity described in
subsection 1 of NRS 612.121.
(c) “Political subdivision” means any entity described in
subsection 9 of NRS 612.055.
2. Any nonprofit organization, political subdivision , employer
who has in its employ only one person who is the owner or sole
shareholder of the organization, trade or business, employer who
has in its employ not more than two persons who share a familial
relationship within the first degree of consanguinity who are
collectively the owners or sole shareholders of the organization,
trade or business or Indian tribe which is subject to this chapter:
(a) Shall pay contributions to the Unemployment Compensation
Fund in the manner provided in NRS 612.535 to 612.550, inclusive,
unless it elects, in accordance with this section, to pay into the
-
*AB423_R1*

– 3 –
Unemployment Compensation Fund, in lieu of contributions, as
reimbursement an amount equivalent to the amount of regular
unemployment compensation benefits and one-half of the extended
benefits paid to claimants that is attributable to wages paid, except
that after December 31, 1978, a political subdivision, and after
December 21, 2000, an Indian tribe, shall reimburse an amount
equal to the regular unemployment compensation benefits and all of
the extended benefits. An Indian tribe may elect to become liable for
payments by way of reimbursement in lieu of contributions for the
tribe as a whole, or for any political subdivision, subsidiary, wholly
owned business, or any combination thereof. The amount of benefits
payable by each employer who elects to make payments by way of
reimbursement in lieu of contributions must be an amount which
bears the same ratio to the total benefits paid to a person as the total
base-period wages paid to that person by the employer bear to the
total base-period wages paid to that person by all of the person’s
base-period employers. Two or more employers who have become
liable for payments by way of reimbursement in lieu of
contributions may file a joint application, in accordance with
regulations of the Administrator, for the establishment of a group
account for the purpose of sharing the cost of benefits paid that are
attributable to service in the employ of such employers.
(b) May elect to become liable for payments by way of
reimbursement in lieu of contributions for a period of not less than 4
consecutive calendar quarters beginning with the first day of the
calendar quarter on which it became subject to this chapter by filing
a written notice with the Administrator not later than 30 days
immediately following the date of the determination that it is subject
to this chapter. The organization remains liable for payments by way
of reimbursement in lieu of contributions until it files with the
Administrator a written notice terminating its election not later than
30 days before the beginning of the taxable year for which the
termination is first effective.
3. Any nonprofit organization, political subdivision , employer
who has in its employ only one person who is the owner or sole
shareholder of the organization, trade or business, employer who
has in its employ not more than two persons who share a familial
relationship within the first degree of consanguinity who are
collectively the owners or sole shareholders of the organization,
trade or business or Indian tribe which is paying contributions as
provided in NRS 612.535 to 612.550, inclusive, may change to a
reimbursement-in-lieu-of-contributions basis by filing with the
Administrator not later than 30 days before the beginning of any
taxable year a written notice of its election to become liable for
payments by way of reimbursements in lieu of contributions. The
-
*AB423_R1*

– 4 –
election is not terminable by the organization for that and the next
taxable year.
4. The Administrator may for a good cause extend the period in
which a notice of election or a notice of termination must be filed
and may permit an election to be retroactive, but not any earlier than
with respect to benefits paid after December 31, 1970, for a
nonprofit organization, December 31, 1976, for a political entity, or
December 21, 2000, for an Indian tribe.
5. The Administrator shall notify each nonprofit organization,
political subdivision , employer who has in its employ only one
person who is the owner or sole shareholder of the organization,
trade or business, employer who has in its employ not more than
two persons who share a familial relationship within the first
degree of consanguinity who are collectively the owners or sole
shareholders of the organization, trade or business and Indian tribe
of any determination which the Administrator may make of its
status as an employer and of the effective date of any election which
it makes and of any termination of such election. The
Administrator’s determination is subject to reconsideration, petitions
for hearing and judicial review in accordance with the provisions of
this chapter.
6. The amount of reimbursement in lieu of contributions due
from each employing unit which elects to make reimbursement in
lieu of contributions must be determined by the Administrator as
soon as practicable after the end of each calendar quarter or at the
end of any other period as determined by the Administrator. The
Administrator shall bill each employing unit which makes
reimbursement in lieu of contributions for an amount determined
pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 2. Amounts due under this
subsection must be paid not later than 30 days after a bill is mailed
to the last known address of the employing unit or electronically
transmitted to the employing unit. If payment is not made on or
before the date due and payable, the whole or any part thereafter
remaining unpaid bears interest at the rate of one-half percent per
month or fraction thereof, from and after the due date until payment
is received by the Administrator. The amount of payments due, but
not paid, may be collected by the Administrator, together with
interest and penalties, if any, in the same manner and subject to the
same conditions as contributions due from other employers. The
amount due specified in any bill from the Administrator is
conclusive and binding on the employing unit, unless not later than
15 days after the bill was mailed to its last known address or
electronically transmitted to it, the employing unit files an
application for redetermination. A redetermination made under this
subsection is subject to petition for hearing and judicial review in
-
*AB423_R1*

– 5 –
accordance with the provisions of this chapter. Payments made by
any nonprofit organization, political subdivision , employer who has
in its employ only one person who is the owner or sole shareholder
of the organization, trade or business, employer who has in its
employ not more than two persons who share a familial
relationship within the first degree of consanguinity who are
collectively the owners or sole shareholders of the organization,
trade or business or Indian tribe under the provisions of this section
must not be deducted, in whole or in part, from the wages of any
person employed by that organization.
7. The Administrator shall:
(a) Suspend the election of an Indian tribe to become liable for
payments by way of reimbursement in lieu of contributions if the
tribe fails to make payment, together with interest and penalties, if
any, within 90 days after the tribe receives a bill from the
Administrator.
(b) Require an Indian tribe whose election to become liable for
payments by way of reimbursement in lieu of contributions is
suspended pursuant to paragraph (a) to pay contributions as set forth
in NRS 612.535 to 612.550, inclusive, for the following taxable year
unless the Administrator receives its payment in full before the
Administrator computes the contribution rates for that year.
(c) Reinstate the election of an Indian tribe to become liable for
payments by way of reimbursement in lieu of contributions that is
suspended pursuant to paragraph (a) if the tribe:
(1) Has paid all contributions pursuant to NRS 612.535 to
612.550, inclusive, including interest and penalties, for not less than
1 year; and
(2) Has no unpaid balance owing to the Administrator for
any contribution, payment in lieu of contributions, penalty or
interest.
8. Benefits are payable on the basis of employment to which
this section applies, in the same amount, on the same terms and
subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of
other employment subject to this chapter.
9. In determining contribution rates assigned to employers
under this chapter, the payrolls of employing units liable for
payments in lieu of contributions must not be included in computing
the contribution rates to be assigned to employers under this chapter.
The reimbursement in lieu of contributions paid by or due from such
employing units must be included in the total assets of the fund in
the same manner as contributions paid by other employers.
10. The provisions of NRS 612.550 do not apply to employers
who elect reimbursement in lieu of contributions.
-
*AB423_R1*

– 6 –
11. Except as inconsistent with the provisions of this section,
the provisions of this chapter and regulations of the Administrator
apply to any matter arising pursuant to this section.
Sec. 3.5. NRS 612.6132 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.6132 1. Notwithstanding any other provision of this
chapter, all employers required to pay contributions under NRS
612.535 are required to pay the special bond contributions provided
in this section. The provisions of this section do not apply to any
nonprofit organization, political subdivision , employer who has in
its employ only one person who is the owner or sole shareholder of
the organization, trade or business, employer who has in its
employ not more than two persons who share a familial
relationship within the first degree of consanguinity who are
collectively the owners or sole shareholders of the organization,
trade or business or Indian tribe which makes reimbursements in
lieu of contributions pursuant to NRS 612.553. The Administrator
shall establish an assessment payable by each employer to the
Administrator for the special bond contributions at such rate or rates
as the Administrator may prescribe.
2. All special bond contributions collected under this section
must remain separate from any other contributions paid pursuant to
this chapter.
3. The amount of the special bond contributions must be
calculated and assessed annually, or more frequently as provided in
subsection 4, by the Administrator as the amount necessary for the
following purposes:
(a) To pay the bond obligations and bond administrative
expenses that are due in that year or any other year;
(b) To replenish amounts that have been drawn from bond
reserves under any instrument or agreement related to the bonds;
(c) To fund or replenish additional reserves in an amount
required under any instrument or agreement related to the bonds to
maintain a debt service coverage ratio at least at the level required
by the trust indenture and instruments in connection with the bonds,
or in an amount that may be necessary to maintain any ratings on the
bonds at a level determined by the State Treasurer, in his or her sole
discretion; and
(d) To fund optional redemption, mandatory redemption,
purchase, refunding or defeasance of outstanding bonds that will
occur in that year.
4. Whenever the Administrator determines that the cash
balance and current estimated receipts of the Unemployment
Compensation Bond Fund will be insufficient at any time to meet
the covenants and conditions of the trust indenture and other
instruments in connection with the bonds, the Administrator shall
-
*AB423_R1*

– 7 –
assess supplemental special bond contributions in an amount
sufficient to increase the balance of the Unemployment
Compensation Bond Fund to the amount required to meet such
covenants and conditions.
5. Special bond contributions are due and payable by each
employer in accordance with such regulations as the Administrator
may prescribe.
6. Except as otherwise provided in NRS 612.6102 to 612.6134,
inclusive, all provisions of this chapter applicable to the collection
or refund of any contributions due under this chapter, including,
without limitation, the enforcement and remedial provisions of NRS
612.625, 612.630, 612.635 and 612.660 to 612.695, inclusive, are
applicable to the collection or refund of amounts due pursuant to
this section and amounts directed pursuant to this section for deposit
into the Unemployment Compensation Bond Fund. In accordance
with NRS 612.680, special bond contributions, including penalties
and interest thereon, due and unpaid from any employer constitute a
lien upon all of the assets of the employer. The lien is to be prior to
and paid in preference to all other liens or claims except prior
recorded liens and prior taxes.
7. The provisions of this section are operative only when any
bonds remain outstanding. During any period that no bonds are
outstanding, the Administrator shall cease charging additional
special bond contributions and shall notify all employers paying
special bond contributions that contributions are no longer being
assessed. The Administrator may continue to collect any special
bond contributions previously assessed and not paid. Any money
remaining in the Unemployment Compensation Bond Fund when no
bonds remain outstanding must be deposited into this State’s
account in the Unemployment Trust Fund of the United States
Treasury.
Sec. 3.7. NRS 612.6175 is hereby amended to read as follows:
612.6175 1. There is hereby created the Interest Repayment
Fund as a special revenue fund.
2. The Fund consists of all money received pursuant to this
section, and must only be used for the payment of interest accruing
and payable on advances received pursuant to NRS 612.290 in
accordance with the conditions specified in Title XII of the Social
Security Act, 42 U.S.C. §§ 1321 et seq., as amended.
3. The Administrator shall establish an assessment that will be
calculated by dividing the interest accruing and payable on advances
received pursuant to NRS 612.290 by 95 percent of the total taxable
wages paid by all employers in this State during the immediately
preceding calendar year.
-
*AB423_R1*

– 8 –
4. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 7, each employer
subject to the provisions of this chapter shall pay a proportionate
share of the assessment established by the Administrator pursuant to
subsection 3. An employer’s proportionate share of the assessment
will be calculated by multiplying the employer’s total taxable wages
paid during the immediately preceding calendar year by the amount
of the assessment. The Administrator shall notify each employer of
his or her proportionate share of the assessment on or before June 30
of each year, and may collect interest on any such amount that
remains unpaid on July 31 of each year in accordance with the
provisions of NRS 612.620. Any money collected from an employer
pursuant to this subsection must be deposited into the Interest
Repayment Fund. The Administrator shall establish procedures
necessary to collect payments pursuant to this subsection.
5. An employer’s proportionate share of the assessment must
not be charged against the experience rating record of the employer.
6. The provisions of law applicable to the collection of
unemployment contributions also apply to the collection of
payments pursuant to this section.
7. The provisions of this section do not apply to any nonprofit
organization, political subdivision , employer who has in its employ
only one person who is the owner or sole shareholder of the
organization, trade or business, employer who has in its employ
not more than two persons who share a familial relationship
within the first degree of consanguinity who are collectively the
owners or sole shareholders of the organization, trade or business
or Indian tribe which makes reimbursements in lieu of contributions
pursuant to NRS 612.553.
8. The provisions of this section are operative only so long as
the Interest Repayment Fund continues to exist and the
Administrator continues to accept and deposit payments received
from employers pursuant to this section into the Interest Repayment
Fund. If the Administrator determines that the assessment is no
longer necessary, the Administrator shall notify all employers
paying a proportionate share of the assessment and shall not accept
any further payments. If and when the Interest Repayment Fund
ceases to exist, any money remaining in the Interest Repayment
Fund, after the payment of all interest accruing and payable on
advances received pursuant to NRS 612.290 and a determination by
the Administrator that no further payments are anticipated, must be
deposited into the Unemployment Compensation Fund.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. (Deleted by amendment.)
-
*AB423_R1*

– 9 –
Sec. 6. Chapter 76 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. A person is eligible for an exemption from the requirement
to pay the fee for an application for a business license required
pursuant to NRS 76.100 and the fee for the first renewal of a state
business license required pursuant to NRS 76.130 if the person:
(a) Does not qualify for an abatement of taxes pursuant to
NRS 360.950 or a partial abatement of taxes pursuant to NRS
360.750, 360.752, 360.753, 360.754 or 360.890; or
(b) If the place of business of the person is in:
(1) A county whose population is 100,000 or more or a city
whose population is 60,000 or more, the person attests that:
(I) By the eighth calendar quarter after the initial
application fee is waived, the business will have at least five full-
time employees on its payroll in that county or city, as applicable;
or
(II) Not later than 2 years after the initial application
fee is waived, the business will make a capital investment of at
least $50,000 in this State; or
(2) A county whose population is less than 100,000 or a city
whose population is less than 60,000, the person attests that:
(I) By the eighth calendar quarter after the initial
application fee is waived, the business will have at least three full-
time employees on its payroll in that county or city, as applicable;
or
(II) Not later than 2 years after the initial application
fee is waived, the business will make a capital investment of at
least $5,000 in this State.
2. Upon the second renewal of a state business license, the
Secretary of State shall review the records of any holder of a state
business license who attested a business would meet the criteria set
forth in subsection 1 and received a fee waiver pursuant to this
section to determine whether the business fulfilled such criteria. If
the business failed to meet such criteria, the person shall pay any
fees which were exempted pursuant to subsection 1.
Sec. 7. NRS 76.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.100 1. A person shall not conduct a business in this State
unless and until the person obtains a state business license issued by
the Secretary of State. If the person is:
(a) An entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license at the time of filing the initial or annual list.
(b) Not an entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license before conducting a business in this State.
-
*AB423_R1*

– 10 –
2. An application for a state business license must:
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Secretary of State;
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business, or if the applicant is an entity organized
pursuant to this title and on file with the Secretary of State, the exact
name on file with the Secretary of State, the business identification
number as assigned by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
225.082, and the location in this State of the place or places of
business;
(c) [Be] Except as otherwise provided in section 6 of this act,
be accompanied by a fee in the amount of $200, except that if the
applicant is a corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78, 78A or
78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required to file an initial or
annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter 80 of
NRS, the application must be accompanied by a fee of $500; and
(d) Include any other information that the Secretary of State
deems necessary.
 If the applicant is an entity organized pursuant to this title and on
file with the Secretary of State and the applicant has no location in
this State of its place of business, the address of its registered agent
shall be deemed to be the location in this State of its place of
business.
3. The application must be signed pursuant to NRS 239.330 by:
(a) The owner of a business that is owned by a natural person.
(b) A member or partner of an association or partnership.
(c) A general partner of a limited partnership.
(d) A managing partner of a limited-liability partnership.
(e) A manager or managing member of a limited-liability
company.
(f) An officer of a corporation or some other person specifically
authorized by the corporation to sign the application.
4. If the application for a state business license is defective in
any respect or the fee required by this section is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the application for correction or
payment.
5. A state business license issued pursuant to this section must
contain the business identification number assigned by the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 225.082.
6. The state business license required to be obtained pursuant
to this section is in addition to any license to conduct business that
must be obtained from the local jurisdiction in which the business is
being conducted.
7. For the purposes of this chapter, a person:
(a) Shall be deemed to conduct a business in this State if a
business for which the person is responsible:
-
*AB423_R1*

– 11 –
(1) Is organized pursuant to this title, other than a business
organized pursuant to:
(I) Chapter 82 or 84 of NRS; or
(II) Chapter 81 of NRS if the business is a nonprofit unit-
owners’ association or a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or
other organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
(2) Has an office or other base of operations in this State;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 76.103, has a
registered agent in this State; or
(4) Pays wages or other remuneration to a natural person
who performs in this State any of the duties for which he or she is
paid.
(b) Shall be deemed not to conduct a business in this State if:
(1) The business for which the person is responsible:
(I) Is not organized pursuant to this title;
(II) Does not have an office or base of operations in this
State;
(III) Does not have a registered agent in this State; and
(IV) Does not pay wages or other remuneration to a
natural person who performs in this State any of the duties for which
he or she is paid, other than wages or other remuneration paid to a
natural person for performing duties in connection with an activity
described in subparagraph (2);
(2) The business for which the person is responsible is
conducting activity in this State solely to provide vehicles or
equipment on a short-term basis in response to a wildland fire, a
flood, an earthquake or another emergency; or
(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is not
conducting a business in this State.
8. As used in this section, “registered agent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 77.230.
Sec. 8. NRS 76.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2 [,]
and section 6 of this act, a person who applies for renewal of a state
business license shall submit a fee in the amount of $200 to the
Secretary of State:
(a) If the person is an entity required to file an annual list with
the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, at the time the person
submits the annual list to the Secretary of State, unless the person
submits a certificate or other form evidencing the dissolution of the
entity; or
(b) If the person is not an entity required to file an annual list
with the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, on the last day of
the month in which the anniversary date of issuance of the state
-
*AB423_R1*

– 12 –
business license occurs in each year, unless the person submits a
written statement to the Secretary of State, at least 10 days before
that date, indicating that the person will not be conducting a
business in this State after that date.
2. [If] Except as otherwise provided in section 6 of this act, if
the person applying for the renewal of a state business license
pursuant to subsection 1 is a corporation organized pursuant to
chapter 78, 78A or 78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required
to file an initial or annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to
chapter 80 of NRS, the fee for the renewal of a state business license
is $500.
3. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing an application for renewal of the state business license of a
person who holds a state business license, provide to the person a
notice of the state business license fee due pursuant to this section
and a reminder to file the application for renewal required pursuant
to this section. Failure of any person to receive a notice does not
excuse the person from the penalty imposed by law.
4. If a person fails to submit the annual state business license
fee required pursuant to this section in a timely manner and the
person is:
(a) An entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary of
State pursuant to this title, the person:
(1) Shall pay a penalty of $100 in addition to the annual state
business license fee;
(2) Shall be deemed to have not complied with the
requirement to file an annual list with the Secretary of State; and
(3) Is subject to all applicable provisions relating to the
failure to file an annual list, including, without limitation, the
provisions governing default and revocation of its charter or right to
transact business in this State, except that the person is required to
pay the penalty set forth in subparagraph (1).
(b) Not an entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary
of State, the person shall pay a penalty in the amount of $100 in
addition to the annual state business license fee. The Secretary of
State shall provide to the person a written notice that:
(1) Must include a statement indicating the amount of the
fees and penalties required pursuant to this section and the costs
remaining unpaid.
(2) May be provided electronically, if the person has
requested to receive communications by electronic transmission, by
electronic mail or other electronic communication.
5. A person who continues to do business in this State without
renewing the person’s state business license before its renewal date
is subject to the fees and penalties provided for in this section unless
-
*AB423_R1*

– 13 –
the person files a certificate of cancellation of the person’s state
business license with the Secretary of State.
6. The Secretary of State shall waive the annual state business
license fee and any related penalty imposed on a natural person or
partnership if the natural person or partnership provides evidence
satisfactory to the Secretary of State that the natural person or
partnership conducted no business in this State during the period for
which the fees and penalties would be waived.
Sec. 9. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 10. Chapter 707 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
Except as otherwise provided in federal law, notwithstanding
any specific statute or ordinance to the contrary, a land use
authority with jurisdiction over an application to modify a facility
for personal wireless service shall review an application to modify
the facility in accordance with the requirements of 47 U.S.C. §
332, as amended, 47 U.S.C. § 1455(a) and any applicable rules,
interpretations and requirements imposed by the Federal
Communications Commission and the Federal Aviation
Administration.
Sec. 11. NRS 707.550 is hereby amended to read as follows:
707.550 As used in NRS 707.550 to 707.585, inclusive, and
section 10 of this act, unless the context otherwise requires, the
words and terms defined in NRS 707.555 to 707.570, inclusive,
have the meanings ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 12. NRS 707.585 is hereby amended to read as follows:
707.585 1. A land use authority that denies the approval of an
application to construct or modify a facility for personal wireless
service shall issue a written decision. The decision must:
(a) Set forth with specificity each ground on which the authority
denied the approval of the application; and
(b) Describe the documents relied upon by the land use authority
in making its decision.
2. A person who brings an action against a land use authority
pursuant to NRS 278.0233 shall file a copy of the decision and
record with the court.
Sec. 13. 1. This section and sections 1, 2, 3 and 4 to 12,
inclusive, of this act become effective on October 1, 2025.
2. Sections 3.3, 3.5 and 3.7 of this act become effective on
January 1, 2026.
H
-
*AB423_R1*